Maine, session 132, LD572.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend provisions of the State's workers' compensation laws as
determined necessary by the Joint Standing Committee on Labor.
Page 1 - 132LR2068(01)